Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 1. School Safety Patrols.

Sec. 14.33.010.
Requirements for school safety patrols.

The school board of a borough or city school district or regional educational attendance area, or a private or denominational school may require that school safety patrols be established to assist pupils to cross streets and highways adjacent to schools in safety.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1964; am § 53 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 25 ch 46 SLA 1970; am § 27 ch 124 SLA 1975)

Sec. 14.33.020.
Organization of a patrol.

If a school board, or a private or denominational school determines that a safety patrol should be established for a school, the principal of the school shall appoint pupils in the school to serve as members of the patrol.

A pupil may not be appointed a patrol member unless the pupil’s parents or guardian give written consent to the pupil’s membership in the patrol.

The principal shall designate a teacher or teachers in the school to supervise the operation of the patrol.

The principal shall consult with the local law enforcement authority to determine those locations adjacent to the school where the patrol may be most advantageously used.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1964; am § 26 ch 46 SLA 1970; am § 28 ch 124 SLA 1975)

Sec. 14.33.030.
Duties of a patrol.

Patrol members shall

encourage pupils to refrain from crossing streets and highways at other than regular crossings;

direct pupils not to cross streets and highways when the presence of traffic renders crossing unsafe;

when directed, assist pupils to safely board or leave school buses.

A patrol member may not, under any circumstances, be permitted to direct vehicular traffic or be stationed in a street or highway while performing the duties of a patrol member.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1964)

Sec. 14.33.040.
Guidance for patrols.

The commissioner shall, after consulting with the commissioner of public safety, adopt standards to guide patrol members in the conduct of their duties, and shall specify appropriate insignia to be worn by patrol members while on duty.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1964)

Sec. 14.33.050.
Cooperation with law-enforcement authorities.

The state troopers or the police department of a political subdivision of the state may, upon request by the department, a school board, or a private or denominational school, assist in the training and control of safety patrols.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1964; am § 22 ch 127 SLA 1974)

Sec. 14.33.060.
Immunity from liability.

The state or a political subdivision of it, a school board or any individual member of it, a private or denominational school, principal, teacher, patrol member, or parent or guardian of a patrol member is immune from liability that might otherwise be incurred as a result of an injury caused by an act or the failure to act on the part of a patrol member while on duty.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1964)